fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Pilates et yoga > Machines pilates > Tours de Pilates: Accessoires pour tours de Pilates; Kits de conversion pour tours de Pilates; Ressorts pour tours de Pilates
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Jóga a pilates > Trenažéry na pilates > Pilates věže: Příslušenství pro pilates věže; Přestavbové sady pro pilates věže; Pružiny pro pilates věže
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ヨガ・ピラティス > ピラティスマシン > ピラティスタワー: ピラティスタワー用アクセサリー; ピラティスタワー用コンバージョンキット; ピラティスタワー用スプリング
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Joga i pilates > Sprzęt do pilatesu > Poręcze do pilatesu: Akcesoria do wież (pilates); Zestawy do konwersji wież (pilates); Sprężyny do wież (pilates)
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jooga ja pilates > Pilateslaitteet > Pilatestelineet: Pilates-tornien lisävarusteet; Pilates-tornien muunnossarjat; Pilates-tornien jouset
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 요가/필라테스 > 필라테스 기구 > 필라테스 타워: 필라테스 타워 액세서리; 필라테스 타워 변환 키트; 필라테스 타워 스프링
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Машини за пилатес > Уреди за пилатес тип успоредка: Аксесоари за уреди за пилатес тип успоредка; Комплекти за преобразуване на уред за пилатес; Пружини за уред за пилатес
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 瑜珈和皮拉提斯 > 皮拉提斯機 > 皮拉提斯塔: 皮拉提斯半塔配件; 皮拉提斯半塔改裝套件; 皮拉提斯半塔彈簧
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Joga a pilates > Vybavenie na pilates > Veže na pilates: Príslušenstvo k veži na pilates; Súpravy na prestavbu pilatesovej veže; Pružiny do pilatesovej veže
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Jóga és pilátesz > Piláteszgépek > Pilátesztornyok: Pilates torony kiegészítők; Pilates torony átalakító készletek; Pilates toronyrugók
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Yoga și Pilates > Aparate pentru Pilates > Turnuri pentru Pilates: Accesorii pentru turn de pilates; Kituri de conversie pentru turnuri de pilates; Arcuri pentru turnul de pilates
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatestårn: Tilbehør til pilatestårn; Konverteringssett for pilatestårn; Fjærer for pilatestårn
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Yoga y pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Torres de pilates: Accesorios para torres de pilates; Kits de conversión para torres de pilates; Resortes para torres de pilates
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Joga in pilates > Naprave za pilates > Stolpi za pilates: Dodatki za stolp za pilates; Komplet za konverzijo stolpa za pilates; Vzmeti za stolp za pilates
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Тренажеры для пилатеса > Столы-трапеции: Аксессуары для башен для пилатеса; Комплекты для трансформации в башню для пилатеса; Пружины для башен для пилатеса
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Yoga e Pilates > Aparelhos para pilates > Torres para pilates: Acessórios para torres de pilates; Kits de conversão para torres de pilates; Molas para torres de pilates
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Γιόγκα & Pilates > Μηχανήματα Pilates > Πύργοι Pilates: Αξεσουάρ πύργου πιλάτες; Κιτ μετατροπής πύργου πιλάτες; Ελατήρια πύργου πιλάτες
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates Machines > Pilates Towers: Pilates Tower Accessories; Pilates Tower Conversion Kits; Pilates Tower Springs
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Yoga en pilates > Pilatesapparaten > Pilatestorens: Pilatestorenaccessoires; Pilatestorenombouwsets; Pilatestorenveren
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Yoga và Pilate > Máy tập thể dục > Tháp tập Pilate: Phụ kiện tháp Pilates; Bộ chuyển đổi tháp Pilates; Lò xo tháp Pilates
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > โยคะและพิลาทีส > เครื่องพิลาทีส > เสาพิลาทีส: อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องพิลาทิสแบบทาวเวอร์; ชุดอุปกรณ์แปลงเครื่องพิลาทิสแบบทาวเวอร์; สปริงเครื่องพิลาทิสแบบทาวเวอร์
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Joga ir pilatesas > Pilateso treniruokliai > Pilateso stovai: Pilateso bokštų priedai; Pilates bokšto konversijos rinkiniai; Pilateso bokšto spyruoklės
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates-Geräte > Pilates-Türme: Pilates-Tower-Zubehör; Pilates-Tower-Umbausätze; Pilates-Tower-Federn
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Joga i pilates > Sprave za pilates > Tornjevi za pilates: Dodaci za toranj za pilates; Kompleti za preinaku tornjeva za pilates; Opruge za tornjeve za pilates
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Yoga e pilates > Macchine pilates > Torri pilates: Accessori per tower pilates; Kit di conversione per tower pilates; Molle per tower pilates
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Yoga och pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatestorn: Tillbehör till pilatestowers; Ombyggnadssatser för pilatestowers; Fjädrar till pilatestowers
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilates-tårne: Tilbehør til pilatestårne; Konverteringssæt til pilatestårne; Fjedre til pilatestårne
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Yoga ve Pilates > Pilates Makineleri > Pilates Kuleleri: Pilates kulesi aksesuarları; Pilates kulesi dönüştürme kitleri; Pilates kulesi yayları
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 瑜伽与普拉提 > 普拉提健身器 > 普拉提滑轮塔: 普拉提塔配件; 普拉提塔改装套件; 普拉提塔弹簧
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Ioga e pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Torres de pilates: Acessórios para torres de Pilates; Kits de conversão para torres de Pilates; Molas para torres de Pilates